California statutes. Public Contract Code
(b) Any public entity requiring prospective bidders to complete and submit questionnaires and financial statements, as described in subdivision (a), shall adopt and apply a uniform system of rating bidders on the basis of the completed questionnaires and financial statements, in order to determine both the minimum requirements permitted for qualification to bid, and the type and size of the contracts upon which each bidder shall be deemed qualified to bid. The uniform system of rating prospective bidders shall be based on objective criteria.

(c) A public entity may establish a process for prequalifying prospective bidders pursuant to this section on a quarterly basis and a prequalification pursuant
 to this process shall be valid for one calendar year following the date of initial prequalification.

(d) Any public entity requiring prospective bidders on a public works project to prequalify pursuant to this section shall establish a process that will allow prospective bidders to dispute their proposed prequalification rating prior to the closing time for receipt of bids. The appeal process shall include the following:

(1) Upon request of the prospective bidder, the public entity shall provide notification to the prospective bidder in writing of the basis for the prospective bidder’s disqualification and any supporting evidence that has been received from others or adduced as a result of an investigation by the public entity.

(2) The prospective bidder shall be given the opportunity to rebut any evidence used as a basis for disqualification and to present evidence to the public entity as to why the prospective bidder should be found qualified.

(3) If the prospective bidder chooses not to avail itself of this process, the proposed prequalification rating may be adopted without further proceedings.

(e) For the purposes of subdivision (a), a financial statement shall not be required from a contractor who has qualified as a Small Business Administration entity pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (d) of Section 14837 of the Government Code, when the bid is no more than 25 percent of the qualifying amount provided in paragraph (1) of subdivision (d) of Section 14837 of the Government
 Code.

(f) Nothing in this section shall preclude an awarding agency from prequalifying or disqualifying a subcontractor. The disqualification of a subcontractor by an awarding agency does not disqualify an otherwise prequalified contractor.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 615, Sec. 360.   (AB 474)   Effective January 1, 2022.   Operative January 1, 2023, pursuant to Sec. 463 of Stats. 2021, Ch. 615.)
-------------------------------------------

20102.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this part to the contrary, where plans and specifications have been prepared by a public agency, whose activities are subject to this part, in order for a public project to be put out for formal or informal bid, and, subsequently, the public agency elects to perform the work by day’s labor, the public agency shall perform the work in strict accordance with these same plans and specifications.

Revisions of the plans and specifications may be made once a justification detailing the specific reasons for the change or changes has been approved by the public agency or its project director and a copy of the change and its justification is placed in the project file.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 694, Sec. 9.)
-------------------------------------------

20103.5.

In all contracts subject to this part where federal funds are involved, no bid submitted shall be invalidated by the failure of the bidder to be licensed in accordance with the laws of this state. However, at the time the contract is awarded, the contractor shall be properly licensed in accordance with the laws of this state. The first payment for work or material under any contract shall not be made unless and until the Registrar of Contractors verifies to the agency that the records of the Contractors’ State License Board indicate that the contractor was properly licensed at the time the contract was awarded. Any bidder or contractor not so licensed shall be subject to all legal penalties imposed by law, including, but not limited to, any appropriate disciplinary action by the Contractors’ State License Board. The agency shall include a statement to that effect in the standard form of prequalification questionnaire and financial statement. Failure of the bidder to obtain proper and adequate licensing for an award of a contract shall constitute a failure to execute the contract and shall result in the forfeiture of the security of the bidder.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 20104 by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1414, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

20103.6.

(a) (1) Any local agency subject to this chapter shall, in the procurement of architectural design services requiring an expenditure in excess of ten thousand dollars ($10,000), include in any request for proposals for those services or invitations to bid from a prequalified list for a specific project a disclosure of any contract provision that would require the contracting architect to indemnify and hold harmless the local agency against any and all liability, whether or not caused by the activity of the contracting architect.

(2) The disclosure statement shall be prominently set forth in bold type.

(b) In the event a local agency fails to comply with paragraph (1) of subdivision (a), that local agency shall (1) be precluded from requiring the selected architect to agree to any contract provision requiring the selected architect to indemnify or hold harmless the local agency against any and all liability not caused by the activity of the selected architect, (2) cease discussions with the selected architect and reopen the request for proposals or invitations to bid from a qualification list, or (3) mutually agree to an indemnity clause acceptable to both parties.

(c) This section shall become operative on July 1, 1998.

(History: Added by Stats. 1997, Ch. 722, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1998.   Section operative July 1, 1998, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

20103.7.

A local agency subject to this chapter taking bids for the construction of a public work or improvement shall, upon request from a contractor plan room service,
 provide an electronic copy of a project’s contract documents at no charge to the contractor plan room.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 371, Sec. 2.   (AB 2036)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 1.3. Award of Contracts [20103.8. - 20103.8.]

20103.8.

A local agency may require a bid for a public works contract to include prices for items that may be added to, or deducted from, the scope of work in the contract for which the bid is being submitted. Whenever additive or deductive items are included in a bid, the bid solicitation shall specify which one of the following methods will be used to determine the lowest bid. In the absence of a specification, only the method provided by subdivision (a) will be used:

(a) The lowest bid shall be the lowest bid price on the base contract without consideration of the prices on the additive or deductive items.

(b) The lowest bid shall be the lowest total of the bid prices on the base contract and those additive or deductive items that were specifically identified in the bid solicitation as being used for the purpose of determining the lowest bid price.

(c) The lowest bid shall be the lowest total of the bid prices on the base contract and those additive or deductive items that when taken in order from a specifically identified list of those items in the solicitation, and added to, or subtracted from, the base contract, are less than, or equal to, a funding amount publicly disclosed by the local agency before the first bid is opened.

(d) The lowest bid shall be determined in a manner that prevents any information that would identify any of the bidders or proposed subcontractors or suppliers from being revealed to the public entity before the ranking of all bidders from lowest to highest has been determined.

A responsible bidder who submitted the lowest bid as determined by this section shall be awarded the contract, if it is awarded. This section does not preclude the local agency from adding to or deducting from the contract any of the additive or deductive items after the lowest responsible bidder has been determined.

(e) Nothing in this section shall preclude the prequalification of subcontractors.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 62, Sec. 243.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 1.5. Resolution of Construction Claims [20104. - 20104.6.]

20104.

(a) (1) This article applies to all public works claims of three hundred seventy-five thousand dollars ($375,000) or less which arise between a contractor and a local agency.

(2) This article shall not apply to any claims resulting from a contract between a contractor and a public agency when the public agency has elected to resolve any disputes pursuant to Article 7.1 (commencing with Section 10240) of Chapter 1 of Part 2.

(b) (1) “Public work” means “public works contract” as defined in Section 1101 but does not include any work or improvement contracted for by the state or
 the Regents of the University of California.

(2) “Claim” means a separate demand by the contractor for (A) a time extension, (B) payment of money or damages arising from work done by, or on behalf of, the contractor pursuant to the contract for a public work and payment of which is not otherwise expressly provided for or the claimant is not otherwise entitled to, or (C) an amount the payment of which is disputed by the local agency.

(c) The provisions of this article or a summary thereof shall be set forth in the plans or specifications for any work which may give rise to a claim under this article.

(d) This article applies only to contracts entered into on or after January 1, 1991.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 697, Sec. 47.   (SB 189)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative July 1, 2012, by Sec. 105 of Ch. 697.)
-------------------------------------------

20104.2.

For any claim subject to this article, the following requirements apply:

(a) The claim shall be in writing and include the documents necessary to substantiate the claim. Claims must be filed on or before the date of final payment. Nothing in this subdivision is intended to extend the time limit or supersede notice requirements otherwise provided by contract for the filing of claims.

(b) (1) For claims of less than fifty thousand dollars ($50,000), the local agency shall respond in writing to any written claim within 45 days of receipt of the claim, or may request, in writing, within 30 days of receipt of the claim, any additional documentation supporting the claim or relating to defenses to the claim the local agency may have against the claimant.

(2) If additional information is thereafter required, it shall be requested and provided pursuant to this subdivision, upon mutual agreement of the local agency and the claimant.

(3) The local agency’s written response to the claim, as further documented, shall be submitted to the claimant within 15 days after receipt of the further documentation or within a period of time no greater than that taken by the claimant in producing the additional information, whichever is greater.

(c) (1) For claims of over fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) and less than or equal to three hundred seventy-five thousand dollars ($375,000), the local agency shall respond in writing to all written claims within 60 days of receipt of the claim, or may request, in writing, within 30 days of receipt of the claim, any additional documentation supporting the claim or relating to defenses to the claim the local agency may have against the claimant.

(2) If additional information is thereafter required, it shall be requested and provided pursuant to this subdivision, upon mutual agreement of the local agency and the claimant.

(3) The local agency’s written response to the claim, as further documented, shall be submitted to the claimant within 30 days after receipt of the further documentation, or within a period of time no greater than that taken by the claimant in producing the additional information or requested documentation, whichever is greater.

(d) If the claimant disputes the local agency’s written response, or the local agency fails to respond within the time prescribed, the claimant may so notify the local agency, in writing, either within 15 days of receipt of the local agency’s response or within 15 days of the local agency’s failure to respond within the time prescribed, respectively, and demand an informal conference to meet and confer for settlement of the issues in dispute. Upon a demand, the local agency shall schedule a meet and confer conference within 30 days for settlement of the dispute.

(e) Following the meet and confer conference, if the claim or any portion remains in dispute, the claimant may file a claim as provided in Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 900) and Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 910) of Part 3 of Division 3.6 of Title 1 of the Government Code. For purposes of those provisions, the running of the period of time within which a claim must be filed shall be tolled from the time the claimant submits his or her written claim pursuant to subdivision (a) until the time that claim is denied as a result of the meet and confer process, including any period of time utilized by the meet and confer process.

(f) This article does not apply to tort claims and nothing in this article is intended nor shall be construed to change the time periods for filing tort claims or actions specified by Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 900) and Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 910) of Part 3 of Division 3.6 of Title 1 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 726, Sec. 22.   Effective September 22, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

20104.4.

The following procedures are established for all civil actions filed to resolve claims subject to this article:

(a) Within 60 days, but no earlier than 30 days, following the filing or responsive pleadings, the court shall submit the matter to nonbinding mediation unless waived by mutual stipulation of both parties. The mediation process shall provide for the selection within 15 days by both parties of a disinterested third person as mediator, shall be commenced within 30 days of the submittal, and shall be concluded within 15 days from the commencement of the mediation unless a time requirement is extended upon a good cause showing to the court or by stipulation of both parties. If the parties fail to select a mediator within the 15-day period, any party may petition the court to appoint the mediator.

(b) (1) If the matter remains in dispute, the case shall be submitted to judicial arbitration pursuant to Chapter 2.5 (commencing with Section 1141.10) of Title 3 of Part 3 of the Code of Civil Procedure, notwithstanding Section 1141.11 of that code. The Civil Discovery Act (Title 4 (commencing with Section 2016.010) of Part 4 of the Code of Civil Procedure) shall apply to any proceeding brought under this subdivision consistent with the rules pertaining to judicial arbitration.

(2) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, upon stipulation of the parties, arbitrators appointed for purposes of this article shall be experienced in construction law, and, upon stipulation of the parties, mediators and arbitrators shall be paid necessary and reasonable hourly rates of pay not to exceed their customary rate, and such fees and expenses shall be paid equally by the parties, except in the case of arbitration where the arbitrator, for good cause, determines a different division. In no event shall these fees or expenses be paid by state or county funds.

(3) In addition to Chapter 2.5 (commencing with Section 1141.10) of Title 3 of Part 3 of the Code of Civil Procedure, any party who after receiving an arbitration award requests a trial de novo but does not obtain a more favorable judgment shall, in addition to payment of costs and fees under that chapter, pay the attorney’s fees of the other party arising out of the trial de novo.

(c) The court may, upon request by any party, order any witnesses to participate in the mediation or arbitration process.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 182, Sec. 54.   Effective January 1, 2005.   Operative July 1, 2005, by Sec. 64 of Ch. 182.)
-------------------------------------------

20104.6.

(a) No local agency shall fail to pay money as to any portion of a claim which is undisputed except as otherwise provided in the contract.

(b) In any suit filed under Section 20104.4, the local agency shall pay interest at the legal rate on any arbitration award or judgment. The interest shall begin to accrue on the date the suit is filed in a court of law.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 726, Sec. 22.   Effective September 22, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 1.7. Modifications; Performance; Payment [20104.50. - 20104.50.]

20104.50.

(a) (1) It is the intent of the Legislature in enacting this section to require all local governments to pay their contractors on time so that these contractors can meet their own obligations. In requiring prompt payment by all local governments, the Legislature hereby finds and declares that the prompt payment of outstanding receipts is not merely a municipal affair, but is, instead, a matter of statewide concern.

(2) It is the intent of the Legislature in enacting this article to fully occupy the field of public policy relating to the prompt payment of local governments’ outstanding receipts. The Legislature finds and declares that all government officials, including those in local government, must set a standard of prompt payment that any business in the private sector which may contract for services should look towards for guidance.

(b) Any local agency which fails to make any progress payment within 30 days after receipt of an undisputed and properly submitted payment request from a contractor on a construction contract shall pay interest to the contractor equivalent to the legal rate set forth in subdivision (a) of Section 685.010 of the Code of Civil Procedure.

(c) Upon receipt of a payment request, each local agency shall act in accordance with both of the following:

(1) Each payment request shall be reviewed by the local agency as soon as practicable after receipt for the purpose of determining that the payment request is a proper payment request.

(2) Any payment request determined not to be a proper payment request suitable for payment shall be returned to the contractor as soon as practicable, but not later than seven days, after receipt. A request returned pursuant to this paragraph shall be accompanied by a document setting forth in writing the reasons why the payment request is not proper.

(d) The number of days available to a local agency to make a payment without incurring interest pursuant to this section shall be reduced by the number of days by which a local agency exceeds the seven-day return requirement set forth in paragraph (2) of subdivision (c).

(e) For purposes of this article:

(1) A “local agency” includes, but is not limited to, a city, including a charter city, a county, and a city and county, and is any public entity subject to this part.

(2) A “progress payment” includes all payments due contractors, except that portion of the final payment designated by the contract as retention earnings.

(3) A payment request shall be considered properly executed if funds are available for payment of the payment request, and payment is not delayed due to an audit inquiry by the financial officer of the local agency.

(f) Each local agency shall require that this article, or a summary thereof, be set forth in the terms of any contract subject to this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 799, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 1.8. Damages Related to Competitive Bidding [20104.70. - 20104.70.]

20104.70.

(a) (1) The second lowest bidder, and any person, firm, association, trust, partnership, labor organization, corporation, or other legal entity which has, prior to the letting of the bids on the public works project in question, entered into a contract with the second lowest bidder, may bring an action in superior court if that entity suffers damages as a result of the bid of the second lowest bidder for any contract subject to this part not being accepted due to the successful bidder’s violation, as evidenced by the conviction of the successful bidder therefor, of any provision of Division 4 (commencing with Section 3200) of the Labor Code or of the Unemployment Insurance Code, or of both. 

(2) There shall be a rebuttable presumption that a successful bidder who has been convicted of a violation of any provision of Division 4 (commencing with Section 3200) of the Labor Code or of the Unemployment Insurance Code, or of both, was awarded the bid because that successful bidder was able to lower the bid due to this violation or these violations occurring on the contract for public work awarded by the public agency. 

(b) In an action brought pursuant to this section, the court may award costs and reasonable attorney’s fees, in an amount to be determined in the court’s discretion, to the prevailing party. 

(c) For purposes of an action brought pursuant to this section: 

(1) Employee status shall be determined pursuant to Division 4 (commencing with Section 3200) of the Labor Code with respect to alleged violations of that division, pursuant to the Unemployment Insurance Code with respect to alleged violations of that code, or pursuant to Section 2750.5 of the Labor Code with respect to alleged violations of either Division 4 (commencing with Section 3200) or of the Unemployment Insurance Code, or of both. 

(2) “Second lowest bidder” means the second lowest qualified bidder deemed responsive by the public agency awarding the contract for public work. 

(3) The “second lowest bidder” and the “successful bidder” may include any person, firm, association, corporation, or other legal entity. 

(d) A second lowest bidder who has been convicted of a violation of any provision of Division 4 (commencing with Section 3200) of the Labor Code or of the Unemployment Insurance Code, or both, within one year prior to filing the bid for public work, and who has failed to take affirmative steps to correct that violation or those violations, is prohibited from taking any action authorized by this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 906, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Schools—State School Building Aid Law of 1949 [20105. - 20107.]

20105.

This article shall apply to contracts subject to the State School Building Aid Law of 1949 provided for in Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 15700) of Part 10 of the Education Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 538, Sec. 539.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

20106.

A school district shall not expend money apportioned under the State School Building Aid Law unless the contracts under which the funds are expended have been let after competitive bids pursuant to the Education Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 465, Sec. 11.)
-------------------------------------------

20107.

All bids for construction work shall be presented under sealed cover and shall be accompanied by one of the following forms of bidder’s security:

(a) Cash.

(b) A cashier’s check made payable to the school district.

(c) A certified check made payable to the school district.

(d) A bidder’s bond executed by an admitted surety insurer, made payable to the school district.

Upon an award to the lowest bidder, the security of an unsuccessful bidder shall be returned in a reasonable period of time, but in no event shall that security be held by the school district beyond 60 days from the time the award is made.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 808, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. School Districts [20110. - 20118.4.]

20110.

The provisions of this part shall apply to contracts awarded by school districts subject to Part 21 (commencing with Section 35000) of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Education Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 465, Sec. 11.)
-------------------------------------------

20111.

(a) (1) The governing board of any school district, in accordance with any requirement established by that governing board pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 2000, shall let any contracts involving an expenditure of more than fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) for any of the following:

(A) The purchase of equipment, materials, or supplies to be furnished, sold, or leased to the district.

(B) Services, except construction services.

(C) Repairs, including maintenance as defined in Section 20115, that are not a public project as defined in subdivision (c) of Section 22002.

(2) The governing board shall let the contract to the lowest responsible bidder who shall give security as the board requires, or else reject all bids.

(b) (1) The governing board shall let any contract for a public project, as defined in subdivision (c) of Section 22002, involving an expenditure of fifteen thousand dollars ($15,000) or more, to the lowest responsible bidder who shall give security as the board requires, or else reject all bids. All bids for construction work shall be presented under sealed cover, and shall be accompanied by one of the following forms of bidder’s security:

(A) Cash.

(B) A cashier’s check made payable to the school district.

(C) A
 certified check made payable to the school district.

(D) A bidder’s bond executed by an admitted surety insurer, made payable to the school district.

(2) Upon award to the lowest bidder, the security of an unsuccessful bidder shall be returned in a reasonable period of time, but in no event shall that security be held by the school district beyond 60 days from the time the award is made.

(c) Procurement bid solicitations and awards made by a school district approved to operate at least one federal nonprofit child nutrition program for purchases in support of those programs shall be consistent with the federal procurement standards in Sections 200.318 to 200.326, inclusive, of Part 200 of Title 2 of the Code of Federal Regulations. These awards shall be let to the most responsive and responsible party. The price shall
 be the primary consideration, but not the only determining factor.

(d) This section applies to all equipment, materials, or supplies, whether patented or otherwise, and to contracts awarded pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 2000. This section shall not apply to professional services or advice, insurance services, or any other purchase or service otherwise exempt from this section, or to any work done by day labor or by force account pursuant to Section 20114.

(e) Commencing January 1, 1997, the Superintendent of Public Instruction shall annually adjust the dollar amounts specified in subdivision (a) to reflect the percentage change in the annual average value of the Implicit Price Deflator for State and Local Government Purchases of Goods and Services for the United States, as published by the United States Department of Commerce for the 12-month period ending in the prior
 fiscal year. The annual adjustments shall be rounded to the nearest one hundred dollars ($100).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 395, Sec. 1.   (SB 544)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

20111.5.

(a) The governing board of the district may require that each prospective bidder for a contract, as described under Section 20111, complete and submit to the district a standardized questionnaire and financial statement in a form specified by the district, including a complete statement of the prospective bidder’s financial ability and experience in performing public works. The questionnaire and financial statement shall be verified under oath by the bidder in the manner in which civil pleadings in civil actions are verified. The questionnaires and financial statements shall not be public records and shall not be open to public inspection.

(b) Any school district requiring prospective bidders to complete and submit questionnaires and financial statements, as described in subdivision (a), shall adopt and apply a uniform system of rating bidders on the basis of the completed questionnaires and financial statements, in order to determine the size of the contracts upon which each bidder shall be deemed qualified to bid.

(c) Each prospective bidder on any contract described under Section 20111 shall be furnished by the school district letting the contract with a standardized proposal form that, when completed and executed, shall be submitted as his or her bid. Bids not presented on the forms so furnished shall be disregarded. 

(d) A proposal form required pursuant to subdivision (c) shall not be accepted from any person or other entity who is required to submit a completed questionnaire and financial statement for prequalification pursuant to subdivision (a), but has not done so at least five days prior to the date fixed for the public opening of sealed bids or has not been prequalified, pursuant to subdivision (b), for at least one day prior to that date.

(e) Notwithstanding subdivision (d), any school district may establish a process for prequalifying prospective bidders pursuant to this section on a quarterly basis and may authorize that prequalification to be considered valid for up to one calendar year following the date of initial prequalification.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 390, Sec. 5.   Effective August 27, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

20111.6.

(a) This section applies only to public projects, as defined in subdivision (c) of Section 22002, for which the governing board of the school district uses state general funds, funds received pursuant to the Leroy F. Greene School Facilities Act of 1998 (Chapter 12.5 (commencing with Section 17070.10) of Part 10 of Division 1 of Title 1 of the Education Code), or any funds received, including funds reimbursed, from any future state school bond for a public project that involves a projected expenditure of one million dollars ($1,000,000) or more.

(b) If the governing board of the school district enters into a contract meeting the criteria of subdivision (a), then the governing board of
 the school district shall require that prospective bidders for a construction contract complete and submit to the governing board of the school district a standardized prequalification questionnaire and financial statement. The questionnaire and financial statement shall be verified under oath by the bidder in the manner in which civil pleadings in civil actions are verified. The questionnaires and financial statements are not public records and shall not be open to public inspection.

(c) The governing board of the school district shall adopt and apply a uniform system of rating bidders on the basis of the completed questionnaires and financial statements. This system shall also apply to a person, firm, or corporation that constructs a building described in Section 17406 or 17407 of the Education Code.

(d) The questionnaire and financial statement described in subdivision (b), and the uniform system of rating bidders described in subdivision (c), shall cover, at a minimum, the issues covered by the standardized questionnaire and model guidelines for rating bidders developed by the Department of Industrial Relations pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 20101.

(e) Each prospective bidder shall be furnished by the school district letting the contract with a standardized proposal form that, when completed and executed, shall be submitted as the prospective bidder’s bid. Bids not presented on the forms so furnished shall be disregarded.

(f) A proposal form required pursuant to subdivision (e) shall not be accepted from
 any person or other entity that is required to submit a completed questionnaire and financial statement for prequalification pursuant to subdivision (b) or from any person or other entity that uses a subcontractor that is required to submit a completed questionnaire and financial statement for prequalification pursuant to subdivision (b), but has not done so at least 10 business days before the date fixed for the public opening of sealed bids or has not been prequalified for at least 5 business days before that date. The school district may require the completed questionnaire and financial statement for prequalification to be submitted more than 10 business days before the fixed date for the public opening of sealed bids. The
 school district may also require the prequalification more than five business days before the fixed date.

(g) (1) The governing board of the school district may establish a process for prequalifying prospective bidders pursuant to this section on a quarterly or annual basis and a prequalification pursuant to this process shall be valid for one calendar year following the date of initial prequalification.

(2) The governing board of the school district shall establish a process to prequalify a person, firm, or corporation, including, but not limited to, the prime contractor and, if used, an electrical, mechanical, and plumbing subcontractor, to construct a building described in Section 17406 or 17407 of the Education Code on a quarterly or annual basis. A
 prequalification pursuant to this process shall be valid for one calendar year following the date of initial prequalification.

(h) This section does not preclude the governing board of the school district from prequalifying or disqualifying a subcontractor of any specialty classification described in Section 7058 of the Business and Professions Code.

(i) For purposes of this section, bidders shall include both of the following:

(1) A prime contractor, as defined in Section 4113, that is either of the following:

(A) A general engineering contractor described in Section 7056 of the Business and Professions Code.

(B) A general building contractor described in Section 7057 of the Business and Professions Code.

(2) If utilized, each electrical, mechanical, and plumbing contractor, whether as a prime contractor or as a subcontractor, as defined in Section 4113.

(j) If a public project covered by this section includes electrical, mechanical, or plumbing components that will be performed by electrical, mechanical, or plumbing contractors, a list of prequalified general contractors and electrical, mechanical, and plumbing subcontractors shall be made available by the school district to all bidders at least five business days before the dates fixed for the public opening of sealed bids. The school district may require the list to be made available more than five business days before
 the fixed dates for the public opening of sealed bids.

(k) For purposes of this section, electrical, mechanical, and plumbing subcontractors are contractors licensed pursuant to Section 7058 of the Business and Professions Code, specifically contractors holding C-4, C-7, C-10, C-16, C-20, C-34, C-36, C-38, C-42, C-43, and C-46 licenses, pursuant to regulations of the Contractors’ State License Board.

(l) This section does not apply to a school district with an average daily attendance of less than 2,500.

(m) (1) This section applies only to contracts awarded on or after January 1, 2014.

(2) The amendments made to this section by Chapter 408 of
 the Statutes of 2014 apply only to contracts awarded on or after January 1, 2015.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 581, Sec. 1.   (AB 1433)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

20112.

For the purpose of securing bids the governing board of a school district shall publish at least once a week for two weeks in some newspaper of general circulation published in the district, or if there is no such paper, then in some newspaper of general circulation, circulated in the county, and may post on the district’s Web site or through an electronic portal, a notice calling for bids, stating the work to be done or materials or supplies to be furnished and the time when and the place and the Web site where bids will be opened. Whether or not bids are opened exactly at the time fixed in the public notice for opening bids, a bid shall not be received after that time. The governing board of the district may accept a bid that was submitted either electronically or on paper.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 739, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

20113.

(a) In an emergency when any repairs, alterations, work, or improvement is necessary to any facility of public schools to permit the continuance of existing school classes, or to avoid danger to life or property, the board may, by unanimous vote, with the approval of the county superintendent of schools, do either of the following:

(1) Make a contract in writing or otherwise on behalf of the district for the performance of labor and furnishing of materials or supplies for the purpose without advertising for or inviting bids.

(2) Notwithstanding Section 20114, authorize the use of day labor or force account for the purpose.

(b) Nothing in this section shall eliminate the need for any bonds or security otherwise required by law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 897, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

20114.

(a) In each school district, the governing board may make repairs, alterations, additions, or painting, repainting, or decorating upon school buildings, repair or build apparatus or equipment, make improvements on the school grounds, erect new buildings, and perform maintenance as defined in Section 20115 by day labor, or by force account, whenever the total number of hours on the job does not exceed 350 hours. Moreover, in any school district having an average daily attendance of 35,000 or greater, the governing board may, in addition, make repairs to school buildings, grounds, apparatus, or equipment, including painting or repainting, and perform maintenance, as defined in Section 20115, by day labor or by force account whenever the total number of hours on the job does not exceed 750 hours, or when the cost of material does not exceed twenty-one thousand dollars ($21,000).

(b) For purposes of this section, day labor shall include the use of maintenance personnel employed on a permanent or temporary basis.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 897, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

20115.

For purposes of Section 20114, “maintenance” means routine, recurring, and usual work for the preservation, protection, and keeping of any publicly owned or publicly operated facility for its intended purposes in a safe and continually usable condition for which it was designed, improved, constructed, altered, or repaired. “Facility” means any plant, building, structure, ground facility, utility system, or real property.
